Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
Article 3. Relations of Members and Managers to Persons Dealing with Limited Liability Company

Effective date. —

Laws 2010, ch. 94, § 5, makes the act effective July 1, 2010.

§ 17-29-301.
No agency power of member as member.

A member is not an agent of a limited liability company solely by reason of being a member.

A person’s status as a member does not prevent or restrict law other than this chapter from imposing liability on a limited liability company because of the person’s conduct.

History.

Laws 2010, ch. 94, § 1.

§ 17-29-302.
Statement of authority.

A limited liability company may deliver to the secretary of state for filing a statement of authority. The statement:

Shall include the name of the company and the street and mailing addresses of its designated office;

With respect to any position that exists in or with respect to the company, may state the authority, or limitations on the authority, of all persons holding the position to:

Execute an instrument transferring real property held in the name of the company; or

Enter into other transactions on behalf of, or otherwise act for or bind, the company; and

May state the authority, or limitations on the authority, of a specific person to:

Execute an instrument transferring real property held in the name of the company; or

Enter into other transactions on behalf of, or otherwise act for or bind, the company.

To amend or cancel a statement of authority filed by the secretary of state under W.S. 17-29-205(a), a limited liability company shall deliver to the secretary of state for filing an amendment or cancellation stating:

The name of the company;

The street and mailing addresses of the company’s designated office;

The caption of the statement being amended or cancelled and the date the statement being affected became effective; and

The contents of the amendment or a declaration that the statement being affected is cancelled.

A statement of authority affects only the power of a person to bind a limited liability company to persons that are not members.

Subject to subsection (c) of this section and W.S. 17-29-103(d) and except as otherwise provided in subsections (f), (g) and (h) of this section, a limitation on the authority of a person or a position contained in an effective statement of authority is not by itself evidence of knowledge or notice of the limitation by any person.

Subject to subsection (c) of this section, a grant of authority not pertaining to transfers of real property and contained in an effective statement of authority is conclusive in favor of a person that gives value in reliance on the grant, except to the extent that when the person gives value:

The person has knowledge to the contrary;

The statement has been cancelled or restrictively amended under subsection (b) of this section; or

A limitation on the grant is contained in another statement of authority that became effective after the statement containing the grant became effective.

Subject to subsection (c) of this section, an effective statement of authority that grants authority to transfer real property held in the name of the limited liability company and that is recorded by certified copy in the office for recording transfers of the real property is conclusive in favor of a person that gives value in reliance on the grant without knowledge to the contrary, except to the extent that when the person gives value:

The statement has been cancelled or restrictively amended under subsection (b) of this section and a certified copy of the cancellation or restrictive amendment has been recorded in the office for recording transfers of the real property; or

A limitation on the grant is contained in another statement of authority that became effective after the statement containing the grant became effective and a certified copy of the later effective statement is recorded in the office for recording transfers of the real property.

Subject to subsection (c) of this section, if a certified copy of an effective statement containing a limitation on the authority to transfer real property held in the name of a limited liability company is recorded in the office for recording transfers of that real property, all persons are deemed to know of the limitation.

Subject to subsection (j) of this section, an effective statement of dissolution or termination is a cancellation of any filed statement of authority for the purposes of subsection (f) of this section and is a limitation on authority for the purposes of subsection (g) of this section.

After a statement of dissolution becomes effective, a limited liability company may deliver to the secretary of state for filing and, if appropriate, may record a statement of authority that is designated as a post dissolution statement of authority. The statement operates as provided in subsections (f) and (g) of this section.

Unless earlier cancelled, an effective statement of authority is cancelled by operation of law five (5) years after the date on which the statement, or its most recent amendment, becomes effective. This cancellation operates without need for any recording under subsection (f) or (g) of this section.

An effective statement of denial operates as a restrictive amendment under this section and may be recorded by certified copy for the purposes of paragraph (f)(i) of this section.

History.

Laws 2010, ch. 94, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) or (

l

) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 17-29-303.
Statement of denial.

A person named in a filed statement of authority granting that person authority may deliver to the secretary of state for filing a statement of denial that:

Provides the name of the limited liability company and the caption of the statement of authority to which the statement of denial pertains; and

Denies the grant of authority.

History.

Laws 2010, ch. 94, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 17-29-304.
Liability of members and managers.

The debts, obligations or other liabilities of a limited liability company, whether arising in contract, tort or otherwise:

Are solely the debts, obligations or other liabilities of the company; and

Do not become the debts, obligations or other liabilities of a member or manager solely by reason of the member acting as a member or manager acting as a manager.

Repealed by Laws 2016, ch. 54, § 2.

For purposes of imposing liability on any member or manager of a limited liability company for the debts, obligations or other liabilities of the company, a court shall consider only the following factors no one (1) of which, except fraud, is sufficient to impose liability:

Fraud;

Inadequate capitalization;

Failure to observe company formalities as required by law; and

Intermingling of assets, business operations and finances of the company and the members to such an extent that there is no distinction between them.

In any analysis conducted under subsection (c) of this section, a court shall not consider factors intrinsic to the character and operation of a limited liability company, whether a single or multiple member limited liability company. Factors intrinsic to the character and operation of a limited liability company include but are not limited to:

The ability to elect treatment as a disregarded or pass-through entity for tax purposes;

Flexible operation or organization including the failure to observe any particular formality relating to the exercise of the company’s powers or management of its activities;

The exercise of ownership, influence and governance by a member or manager;

The protection of members’ and managers’ personal assets from the obligations and acts of the limited liability company.

History.

Laws 2010, ch. 94, § 1; 2016 ch. 54, §§ 1, 2, effective March 4, 2016.

The 2016 amendments. —

The first 2016 amendment, by ch. 54 § 1, added (c) through (d)(iv).

The second 2016 amendment, by ch. 54 § 2, repealed former (b), which read: “The failure of a limited liability company to observe any particular formalities relating to the exercise of its powers or management of its activities is not a ground for imposing liability on the members or managers for the debts, obligations or other liabilities of the company.”

Laws 2016, ch. 54 § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 4, 2016.

Piercing appropriate. —

Factors. —

Piercing appropriate. —

Sole member of a limited liability company (LLC) was held liable for the LLC's contractual obligations because piercing the LLC's veil was appropriate under this section; the court looked to undercapitalization and the intermingling of business and finances. Even though there was no classic fraud, the decision to pierce the veil and hold the member responsible for a debt for services which benefitted it was not clearly erroneous. GreenHunter Energy, Inc. v. W. Ecosystems Tech., Inc., 2014 WY 144, 337 P.3d 454,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 165

(Wyo. 2014).

Factors. —

Veil of a limited liability company may be pierced under exceptional circumstances when: (1) the limited liability company is not only owned, influenced and governed by its members, but the required separateness has ceased to exist due to misuse of the limited liability company; and (2) the facts are such that an adherence to the fiction of its separate existence would, under the particular circumstances, lead to injustice, fundamental unfairness, or inequity. This test is fact-driven and flexible, and it focuses on whether the limited liability company has been operated as a separate entity as contemplated by statute, or whether the member has instead misused the entity in an inequitable manner to injure the plaintiff. GreenHunter Energy, Inc. v. W. Ecosystems Tech., Inc., 2014 WY 144, 337 P.3d 454,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 165

(Wyo. 2014).